Maryland, session 2025, HB0609.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
18–402.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *hb0609*

HOUSE BILL 609
(a) (1) Except as provided in paragraphs (2) [and], (3), AND (4) of this
subsection, each applicant for a senatorial scholarship shall:
(i) Take a competitive examination administered by the Office; and
(ii) 1. Be accepted for admission in the regular undergraduate,
graduate, or professional program at an eligible institution; or
2. Be enrolled in a 2–year terminal certificate program in
which the course work is acceptable for transfer credit for an accredited baccalaureate
program in an eligible institution.
(2) An applicant is exempt from the examination if the applicant:
(i) Is attending an eligible institution and has completed at least 1
year in good academic standing at the institution;
(ii) Graduated from high school at least 5 years before application
for a senatorial scholarship;
(iii) Is accepted for admission to a private career institution, if the
institution’s curriculum is approved by the Commission, and the institution is accredited
by a national accrediting association approved by the United States Department of
Education; or
(iv) Is planning to attend or is attending a Maryland community
college.
(3) An applicant is exempt from the requirements of paragraph (1) of this
subsection if the applicant is or was enrolled in a certificate or license program, course, or
sequence of courses at a community college that leads to certification or licensure.
(4) AN APPLICANT IS EXEMPT FROM THE REQUIREMENTS OF
PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION IF THE APPLICANT IS REGISTERED FOR OR IS
PLANNING TO COMPLETE THE REAL PROPERTY APPRAISER QUALIFICATION
CRITERIA OF THE PRACTICAL APPLICATIONS OF REAL ESTATE APPRAISAL
PROGRAM ADOPTED BY THE APPRAISAL FOUNDATION APPRAISER
QUALIFICATIONS BOARD AUTHORIZED UNDER THE FEDERAL FINANCIAL
INSTITUTIONS REFORM, RECOVERY, AND ENFORCEMENT ACT OF 1989.
(b) Each applicant shall:
(1) Be eligible for in–State tuition under this article; and
(2) At the time of the applicant’s initial application, be domiciled in the
legislative district from which the applicant seeks an award.

HOUSE BILL 609 3
(c) (1) Each applicant shall demonstrate to the Office a definite financial need,
and each Senator shall consider the financial need of each applicant.
(2) Each Senator is the final judge of the financial need of each applicant
to whom the Senator awards a scholarship, and the Office may not negate the Senator’s
judgment or impose requirements of time or procedure.
(d) Each applicant shall accept any other conditions attached to the award.
18–405.
(a) Except as provided in [subsection] SUBSECTIONS (B)(3) AND (d) of this
section, a senatorial scholarship may be used only at any community college or
undergraduate, graduate, or professional school in the State.
(b) A senatorial scholarship may be used:
(1) If the curriculum is approved by the Commission, at a degree granting
institution of higher education, a hospital diploma school for training registered nurses, or
to attend a private postsecondary proprietary institution that is accredited by a national
accrediting association approved by the United States Department of Education as a
full–time student; [and]
(2) For educational expenses as defined by the Office, including:
(i) Tuition and mandatory fees; and
(ii) Room and board; AND
(3) FOR EXPENSES TO REGISTER FOR AND COMPLETE THE REAL
PROPERTY APPRAISER QUALIFICATION CRITERIA OF THE PRACTICAL
APPLICATIONS OF REAL ESTATE APPRAISAL PROGRAM ADOPTED BY THE
APPRAISAL FOUNDATION APPRAISER QUALIFICATIONS BOARD AUTHORIZED
UNDER THE FEDERAL FINANCIAL INSTITUTIONS REFORM, RECOVERY, AND
ENFORCEMENT ACT OF 1989.
(c) If on–campus housing is available, a senatorial scholarship may not be used
to pay for off–campus housing.
(d) Each Senator may award not more than 10% of the funds available under this
subtitle to applicants planning to attend accredited undergraduate, graduate, or
professional institutions outside the State, provided the applicant:

HOUSE BILL 609
(1) Will be studying in an academic area that is not offered in a program
that is accredited by a national accrediting association approved by the United States
Department of Education in any institution in the State;
(2) Is a hearing impaired person who will be studying at an institution
outside the State that makes special provisions for hearing impaired students, and
comparable special provisions are not available to the applicant at an institution in the
State; or
(3) Is an individual who is on active duty with the United States military
who is domiciled in this State.
18–501.
(a) There is a program of Delegate Scholarships in this State that are awarded
under this subtitle.
(b) A scholarship awarded under this subtitle may be used at:
(1) An eligible institution for a program of undergraduate, graduate, or
professional studies;
(2) An accredited undergraduate, graduate, or professional institution
outside the State, if the applicant:
(i) Will be studying in an academic area that is not offered in a
program that is accredited by a national accrediting association approved by the United
States Department of Education in any institution in this State;
(ii) Is disabled and will be studying at an institution outside the
State that makes special provisions for disabled students that are not available to the
applicant at an institution in the State; or
(iii) Is an individual who is on active duty with the United States
military who is domiciled in this State; [and]
(3) A private career school within the State that is approved by the
Maryland Higher Education Commission under § 11–202 of this article and that is
accredited by a national accrediting association that is approved by the United States
Department of Education; AND
(4) A PRACTICAL APPLICATIONS OF REAL ESTATE APPRAISAL
PROGRAM ADOPTED BY THE APPRAISAL FOUNDATION APPRAISER
QUALIFICATIONS BOARD AUTHORIZED UNDER THE FEDERAL FINANCIAL
INSTITUTIONS REFORM, RECOVERY, AND ENFORCEMENT ACT OF 1989.

HOUSE BILL 609 5
(c) Money appropriated to the Commission for scholarships awarded under this
section that is not used by the end of the fiscal year shall be retained by the Commission
for use by the awarding Delegate in the Delegate Scholarship Program during subsequent
fiscal years.
18–503.
(a) During each term in office, each Delegate may award the equivalent of four
4–year full–time scholarships, which may be awarded for either 1–, 2–, 3–, or 4–year
periods.
(b) (1) Each scholarship pays the tuition and mandatory fees at any eligible
institution OR EXPENSES TO REGISTER FOR AND COMPLETE A PRACTICAL
APPLICATIONS OF REAL ESTATE APPRAISAL PROGRAM ADOPTED BY THE
APPRAISAL FOUNDATION APPRAISER QUALIFICATIONS BOARD AUTHORIZED
UNDER THE FEDERAL FINANCIAL INSTITUTIONS REFORM, RECOVERY, AND
ENFORCEMENT ACT OF 1989.
(2) The annual amount of a scholarship at a public or private institution or
any graduate or professional program may not exceed the equivalent annual tuition and
mandatory fees of an undergraduate program at the 4–year public institution of higher
education within the University System of Maryland, other than the University of
Maryland Global Campus and University of Maryland, Baltimore Campus, with the
highest annual expenses for a full–time resident undergraduate.
18–506.
(a) As an alternative to the scholarship awards authorized by §§ 18–503 through
18–505 of this subtitle, and subject to the provisions of subsection (b) of this section, during
each year in office each Delegate may award scholarships in a total amount equal to four
times the tuition and mandatory fees for a full–time undergraduate student enrolled at the
University of Maryland, College Park Campus for the academic year commencing in that
year.
(b) A scholarship award under subsection (a) of this section:
(1) May not be for an amount less than $200 or more than one–half of the
total amount of scholarships authorized by subsection (a) of this section for that year;
(2) Shall be used at an eligible institution OR A PRACTICAL
APPLICATIONS OF REAL ESTATE APPRAISAL PROGRAM ADOPTED BY THE
APPRAISAL FOUNDATION APPRAISER QUALIFICATIONS BOARD AUTHORIZED
UNDER THE FEDERAL FINANCIAL INSTITUTIONS REFORM, RECOVERY, AND
ENFORCEMENT ACT OF 1989;
(3) May be used by:

HOUSE BILL 609
(i) A graduate, undergraduate, or professional student;
(ii) A student at a private career school within the State that is
approved by the Maryland Higher Education Commission under § 11–202 of this article
and that is accredited by a national accrediting association that is approved by the United
States Department of Education; [or]
(iii) A student who is currently enrolled or was enrolled in the last 2
years in a certificate or license program, course, or sequence of courses at a community
college that leads to certification or licensure as reimbursement for educational expenses
that are defined by the Office and include tuition, mandatory fees, and room and board;
[and] OR
(IV) A STUDENT WHO IS REGISTERED FOR OR IS PLANNING TO
COMPLETE THE REAL PROPERTY APPRAISER QUALIFICATION CRITERIA OF THE
PRACTICAL APPLICATIONS OF REAL ESTATE APPRAISAL PROGRAM ADOPTED BY
THE APPRAISAL FOUNDATION APPRAISER QUALIFICATIONS BOARD AUTHORIZED
UNDER THE FEDERAL FINANCIAL INSTITUTIONS REFORM, RECOVERY, AND
ENFORCEMENT ACT OF 1989; AND
(4) To the extent it is not used by the student, shall be recredited to the
Delegate’s scholarship account and may be awarded in the next 12 months by that Delegate
to another student pursuant to this section.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.